Nevada, session 83, SB506.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Interim Finance Committee for allocation to the
State Public Charter School Authority to provide money to charter
schools for salary increases for teachers and education support
professionals the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................. $19,314,297
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................. $19,314,297
2. On or before June 15, 2025, each charter school in this State
shall submit to the State Public Charter School Authority a
statement of the number of teachers and education support
professionals employed by the charter school on October 1, 2024.
The State Public Charter School Authority shall compile this
information and, not later than July 15, 2025:
-
*SB506*

– 2 –
(a) Submit the compiled information to the Interim Finance
Committee.
(b) Estimate the total amount of money which the Authority will
be authorized to distribute to each charter school for Fiscal Year
2025-2026 pursuant to subsection 7 and provide this information to
each charter school.
3. On or before June 15, 2026, each charter school in this State
shall submit to the State Public Charter School Authority a
statement of the number of teachers and education support
professionals employed by the charter school on October 1, 2025.
The State Public Charter School Authority shall compile this
information and, not later than July 15, 2026:
(a) Submit the compiled information to the Interim Finance
Committee.
(b) Estimate the total amount of money which the Authority will
be authorized to distribute to each charter school for Fiscal Year
2026-2027 pursuant to subsection 7 and provide this information to
each charter school.
4. On or before August 15, 2025, and August 15, 2026, each
charter school in this State shall submit to the State Public Charter
School Authority a plan by the charter school to increase salaries for
teachers and education support professionals during the then-current
fiscal year which:
(a) Describes the manner in which money distributed to the
charter school will be allocated among the teachers and education
support professionals employed by the charter school; and
(b) Provides for an increase in salary for teachers and education
support professionals which does not replace or supplant any other
form of compensation which was provided to teachers or education
support professionals of the charter school before Fiscal Year 2025-
2026 or which was bargained for or planned for Fiscal Year 2025-
2026 or any succeeding fiscal year before the effective date of this
act.
5. On or before September 15, 2025, and September 15, 2026,
the State Public Charter School Authority shall compile and submit
to the Interim Finance Committee the plans submitted by each
charter school for the then-current fiscal year pursuant to
subsection 4.
6. Money appropriated by subsection 1 may only be allocated
to the State Public Charter School Authority by the Interim Finance
Committee upon request by the Authority after the Authority has
complied with the requirements of subsection 2 or 3, as applicable,
and subsection 5.
-
*SB506*

– 3 –
7. The amount of money distributed by the State Public Charter
School Authority to a charter school pursuant to this section must
not exceed an amount which is equal to:
(a) For Fiscal Year 2025-2026, $19,314,297 multiplied by a
percentage which is the number of teachers and education support
professionals employed by the charter school on October 1, 2024,
expressed as a percentage of the total number of teachers and
education support professionals employed in all of the charter
schools in this State on October 1, 2024.
(b) For Fiscal Year 2026-2027, $19,314,297 multiplied by a
percentage which is the number of teachers and education support
professionals employed by the charter school on October 1, 2025,
expressed as a percentage of the total number of teachers and
education support professionals employed in all of the charter
schools in this State on October 1, 2025.
8. Money appropriated by subsection 1 may only be distributed
by the Authority to a charter school which has complied with the
requirements of subsection 2 or 3, as applicable, and subsection 4.
9. The money appropriated by subsection 1 must be used to
supplement and not supplant or cause to be reduced any other source
of funding for the support of charter schools or for the salary and
compensation of teachers or education support professionals
employed by any charter school.
10. On or before August 1, 2026, and August 1, 2027, each
charter school in this State that received a distribution from the
money appropriated by subsection 1 during Fiscal Year 2025-2026
and Fiscal Year 2026-2027, respectively, shall submit a report to the
State Public Charter School Authority which includes, without
limitation:
(a) Detailed information on how all the money received pursuant
to this section was spent by the charter school during the
immediately preceding fiscal year; and
(b) The actual increase to the salary of teachers and education
support professionals employed by the charter school during the
immediately preceding fiscal year and the amount of such an
increase for which the money received pursuant to this section was
spent.
11. On or before October 1, 2026, and October 1, 2027, the
State Public Charter School Authority shall compile and submit to
the Interim Finance Committee the reports received by the Authority
pursuant to subsection 10 with respect to the immediately preceding
fiscal year.
12. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
-
*SB506*

– 4 –
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
13. As used in this section:
(a) “Administrator” means a person who spends at least 50
percent of his or her work year supervising other staff or licensed
personnel, or both, and who is not classified by the governing body
of the charter school as a professional-technical employee.
(b) “Education support professional” means a person, other than
a teacher or administrator, who is employed to work at a charter
school, including, without limitation:
(1) Paraprofessionals;
(2) School police officers, school resource officers and other
providers of security services at a school;
(3) School nurses;
(4) School counselors;
(5) School psychologists;
(6) School social workers;
(7) Drivers of school buses;
(8) Secretaries;
(9) Members of the custodial or maintenance staff; and
(10) Workers in food services.
(c) “Teacher” means a person licensed pursuant to chapter 391
of NRS who is classified by the governing body of a charter school:
(1) As a teacher and who spends at least 50 percent of his or
her work year providing instruction or discipline to pupils; or
(2) As instructional support staff, who does not hold a
supervisory position and who spends not more than 50 percent of
his or her work year providing instruction to pupils. Such
instructional support staff includes, without limitation, librarians
and persons who provide instructional support.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
H
-
*SB506*